src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
!! # Numerals in Northern Mansi

! --------
! No work on numerals so far.

LEXICON Numerals
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** to lexicon numeral
numeral    #  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
